src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_II_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - g̲íihlgii - ENGLISH : # CLASS_II_STEM_1

     g̲íihlgii+V+Sg+Impv: g̲íihlgii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiga
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiigang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Dir+Past: g̲íihlgiigan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Rel: g̲íihlgiis
     g̲íihlgii+V+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiiganggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: g̲íihlgiigangang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Dir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiigiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiigaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Indir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiigaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Fut+Long: g̲íihlgiiäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Fut+Short: g̲íihlgiiäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+Simp+Fut: g̲íihlgiiäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Imm+Fut: g̲íihlgiiäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+Rel+Fut: g̲íihlgiiäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Fut+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaʼáa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaʼáang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdláa
     g̲íihlgii+V+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdláang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼuuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Res: g̲íihlgiiäsaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼuujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: g̲íihlgiiäsaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Cert+Fut: g̲íihlgiiäsaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: g̲íihlgiiäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+Pl+Impv: g̲íihlgiiʼuu
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Dir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼwägan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Indir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼwaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigangʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigangʼwaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: g̲íihlgiigangʼwaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼwägiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼwägaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼwägaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼuuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Res: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cert+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Ints+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaaʼahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Cont: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Rflx: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaʼahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: g̲íihlgiiʼwaaäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: g̲íihlgiiʼang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangga
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Dir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Indir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼangang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigangʼanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: g̲íihlgiigangʼangang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼanggaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼanggaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: g̲íihlgiiʼangäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaaʼáng
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaaʼánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼuuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Res: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼuujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼaangʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cert+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaangʼahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangäsaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼaangʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Ints+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaaʼahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Cont: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Rflx: g̲íihlgiiʼaangʼahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: g̲íihlgiiʼangäseehl
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼuu
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwägan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigangʼangʼwaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: g̲íihlgiigangʼangʼwaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: g̲íihlgiigangʼangʼwaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwägiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwägaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwägaangaan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäs
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsga
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaas
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Res: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaʼahl
     g̲íihlgii+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: g̲íihlgiiʼangʼwaaäseehl
